modules/spellchecker/hunspell_3p/tests/opentaal_cpdpat.aff
FLAG long
COMPOUNDBEGIN Ca
COMPOUNDMIDDLE Cb
COMPOUNDEND Cc
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG Cp
ONLYINCOMPOUND Cx

CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 1
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /Ch /Xs

SFX Ch Y 2
SFX Ch 0 s/CaCbCxCp .
SFX Ch 0 s-/CaCbCcCp .
